apertium-hye-eng.hye.dix
    <pardef n="արքա__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>յից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յի</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ը</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ների</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ները</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="քարտեզագ/իր__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>րից</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րի</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րին</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րով</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իր</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրը</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրն</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րերից</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րերի</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րերին</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րերով</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րեր</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րերը</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րերն</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="արծ/իվ__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>վից</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>վի</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>վին</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>վով</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվ</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվը</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվն</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվներից</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվների</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվներին</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվներով</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվներ</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվները</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իվներն</l><r>իվ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="լ/ինդ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>նդից</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդի</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդին</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդում</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդով</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ինդ</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ինդը</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ինդն</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդերից</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդերի</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդերին</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդերում</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդերով</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդեր</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդերը</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նդերն</l><r>ինդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="լամա"><i>լամա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="թուլա"><i>թուլա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="մայա"><i>մայա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="սպա"><i>սպա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="լինդ"><i>լ</i><par n="լ/ինդ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="պաշտոնյա"><i>պաշտոնյա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="կրիա"><i>կրիա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="հովիվ"><i>հով</i><par n="արծ/իվ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="հսկա"><i>հսկա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="էրեխա" r="LR"><p><l>էրեխա</l><r>երեխա</r></p><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="քարտեզագիր"><i>քարտեզագ</i><par n="քարտեզագ/իր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="արքա"><i>արքա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="բոշա"><i>բոշա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="թամադա"><i>թամադա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ալպակա"><i>ալպակա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ակուլա"><i>ակուլա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="փեսա"><i>փեսա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="գինդ"><i>գ</i><par n="լ/ինդ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="չաղո"><i>չաղո</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="փաշա"><i>փաշա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="սիգա" r="LR"><p><l>սիգա</l><r>սիգ</r></p><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="գյուրզա"><i>գյուրզա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="տղա"><i>տղա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ֆլամինգո"><i>ֆլամինգո</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="փախստյա"><i>փախստյա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ծառա"><i>ծառա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="արծիվ"><i>արծ</i><par n="արծ/իվ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="դավա"><i>դավա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="նինջա"><i>նինջա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="փիլիսոփա"><i>փիլիսոփա</i><par n="արքա__n_aa"/></e>
